Alabama, session 2026rs, SB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-1-53, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§16-1-53
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) BROADCAST. To transmit or exhibit video or, audio,
or photographs in any medium or manner accessible by
Page 1

or photographs in any medium or manner accessible by
SB76 INTRODUCED
televisions, radios, computers, or other Internet enabled
devices.
(2) COVER. To observe for reporting purposes and
conduct broadcasts of the event being reported.
(3) MEDIA ORGANIZATION. A newspaper, news wire, radio
station, television station, television network, website, or
other organization that publishes or broadcasts, at regular
intervals, print, digital, or audio media.
(b)(1) No Except as provided in subdivision (2), no
individual, firm, corporation, or association shall interfere
with or restrict in any manner the ability of media
organizations to cover or broadcast, in any form or format,
regular season and post regular season sporting events,
including, without limitation, all playoffs and championships
involving K-12 schools.
(2) Each school, grades K through 12, shall have the
sole authority to determine which media organization or media
organizations are permitted to cover or broadcast a regular
season and post regular season sporting event, including,
without limitation, all playoffs and championships, and to
contract for the broadcast of regular and post regular season
sporting events involving that school."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2